Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1804
Metropolitan transit authority; establishment; body corporate.

The authority shall be a body corporate and politic and shall be known as Transit Authority of ..................... (filling out the blank with the name of the city), and shall be a governmental subdivision of the State of Nebraska with the powers and authority provided by the Transit Authority Law. The authority is declared to be an instrumentality of the state exercising public and essential governmental functions in the exercise of the powers conferred upon it by the Transit Authority Law.

Laws 1957, c. 23, § 4, p. 160;

Laws 1972, LB 1275, § 4;

Laws 1998, LB 1191, § 7.